Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.165.100

Entrance and exit performance data—Report by school districts—Report by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(1) School districts shall record in the statewide individual student data system annual entrance and exit performance data for each student participating in the learning assistance program according to specifications established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) Annually [by] September 30th, school districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, using a common format prepared by the office:

(a) The amount of academic growth gained by students participating in the learning assistance program;

(b) The number of students who gain at least one year of academic growth;

(c) The specific practices, activities, and programs used by each school building that received learning assistance program funding;

(d) The percentage of learning assistance program funding used to engage community partners, the number of students receiving direct supports and services from those community partners, and the types of supports and services; and

(e) Other data if required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to demonstrate the efficacy of the learning assistance program expenditures to show student academic growth gains including indicators aligned with the accountability framework for schools receiving support under RCW 28A.657.110.

(3) By January 1, 2020, and each January 1st thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall compile the school district data reported as required by subsection (2) of this section, and report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the annual and longitudinal gains for the specific practices, activities, and programs used by the school districts and schools to show which are the most effective. The data must be disaggregated by student subgroups as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data.

[ 2021 c 111 s 8; 2019 c 208 s 1; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 204.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.